Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.271

Liability for false information in filed record.

(1) If a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and filed by the secretary of state contains false information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

(a) A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person's behalf, and knew the information to be false at the time the record was signed; and

(b) A general partner that has notice that the information was false when the record was filed or has become false because of changed circumstances, if the general partner has notice for a reasonably sufficient time before the information is relied upon to enable the general partner to effect an amendment under RCW 25.10.211, file a petition under RCW 25.10.241, or deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change under RCW 23.95.430 or a statement of correction under RCW 23.95.220.

(2) A person who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter that such a person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the record be delivered to the secretary of state for filing is subject to a criminal penalty under RCW 23.95.240.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6114; 2009 c 188 s 208.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.